California, session 20252026, AB1069.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 9860) is added to Division 8.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read: CHAPTER 15. Disaster Planning and Response9860. For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:(a) “Emergency shelter” means a facility established to provide temporary refuge and essential services to individuals displaced by emergencies or disasters.(b) “State Emergency Plan” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 8560 of the Government Code.9861. As part of disaster planning and response, a representative of the county welfare director, in coordination with the lead local agency designated with sheltering support duties under the State Emergency Plan Emergency Support Functions, shall initiate a memorandum of understanding with an area agency on aging (AAA), an independent living center (ILC), or an Aging and Disability Resource Connection (ADRC) program to allow access by the AAA, the ILC, or the ADRC program to an emergency shelter established for evacuation purposes during an active event, in order to ensure that older adults and persons with disabilities receive continuous services and necessary support.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.